ja: タムマウント調整機能: 360°ボールジョイント調整; ギア式/セレーション付きティルター; 高さ調整 (アーム長); メモリーロック対応; オムニボール (多軸) 調整; クイックリリースマウント; 回転 (スイベル) 調整; チルト/角度調整; トゥースレスティルター; その他
hu: Tamtartó-beállítási jellemzők: 360°-os gömbcsuklós állítás; Fogazott dőlésszög-állító; Magasságállítás (karhossz); Memóriazár-kompatibilis; Omni-ball (többtengelyes) állítás; Gyorskioldós rögzítés; Forgatás (forgócsuklós) állítás; Dőlés/szögállítás; Fogazat nélküli dőlésszög-állító; Egyéb
ru: Функции регулировки крепления тома: Шаровое шарнирное соединение 360°; Зубчатый механизм наклона; Регулировка высоты (длина штанги); Совместимость с замком памяти; Многоосевая регулировка Omni-ball; Быстросъёмное крепление; Регулировка поворота (вращения); Регулировка наклона/угла; Беззубчатый механизм наклона; Другое
fi: Tomikiinnikkeen säätöominaisuudet: 360° pallonivelsäätö; Hammastettu kallistin; Korkeuden säätö (varren pituus); Yhteensopiva muistilukon kanssa; Omni-ball-säätö (moniakselinen); Pikakiinnitys; Kääntösäätö; Kallistuksen/kulman säätö; Portaaton kallistin; Muu
es: Características de ajuste del soporte del tom: Ajuste de junta esférica de 360°; Inclinador dentado/con engranajes; Ajuste de altura (longitud del brazo); Compatible con bloqueo de memoria; Ajuste de bola omnidireccional (multieje); Montaje de liberación rápida; Ajuste de rotación (giratorio); Ajuste de inclinación/ángulo; Inclinador sin dientes; Otro
lt-LT: Tomo laikiklio reguliavimo ypatybės: 360° šarnyrinis reguliavimas; Dantytasis posvyrio mechanizmas; Aukščio reguliavimas (svirties ilgis); Suderinamas su atminties užraktu; „Omni-ball“ (daugiaašis) reguliavimas; Greito atleidimo laikiklis; Sukimosi (švytuoklinis) reguliavimas; Posvyrio / kampo reguliavimas; Posvyrio mechanizmas be dantukų; Kita
ko: 톰 마운트 조정 기능: 360° 볼 조인트 조절; 기어식/톱니식 틸터; 높이 조절(암 길이); 메모리 록 호환; 옴니 볼(다축) 조절; 퀵 릴리스 마운트; 회전(스위블) 조절; 기울기/각도 조절; 투스리스 틸터; 기타
nb: Justeringsfunksjoner for tomfeste: 360° kuleleddjustering; Tannhjulsvipper; Høydejustering (armlengde); Kompatibel med minnelås; Omni-ball-justering (flere akser); Hurtigfeste; Rotasjonsjustering (svivel); Vippe-/vinkeljustering; Trinnløs vipper; Annet
de: Einstellfunktionen der Tomhalterung: 360°-Kugelgelenkeinstellung; Verzahnter Neiger; Höhenverstellung (Armlänge); Kompatibel mit Memory Lock; Omni-Ball-Einstellung (mehrachsig); Schnellspannhalterung; Dreh- (Schwenk-)Einstellung; Neigungs-/Winkeleinstellung; Zahnloser Neiger; Sonstige
zh-TW: 筒鼓調整功能: 360° 球窩接頭調整; 齒輪式/鋸齒狀傾斜器; 高度調整 (臂長); 相容記憶鎖; 全向球 (多軸) 調整; 快拆底座; 旋轉 (迴旋) 調整; 傾斜/角度調整; 無齒傾斜器; 其他
th: คุณสมบัติการปรับแต่งฐานยึดทอม: ปรับข้อต่อลูกหมาก 360 องศา; ปรับองศาแบบฟันเฟือง/รอยหยัก; ปรับความสูง (ความยาวแขน); รองรับเมมโมรี่ล็อก; ปรับแบบออมนิบอล (หลายแกน); ตัวยึดแบบปลดเร็ว; ปรับหมุน (สวิง); ปรับความเอียง/มุม; ปรับองศาแบบไร้ฟันเฟือง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Caracteristici de reglare ale suportului pentru tom: Ajustare sferică 360°; Sistem de înclinare dințat; Ajustarea înălțimii (lungimea brațului); Compatibil cu blocare de memorie (memory lock); Ajustare Omni-ball (multiaxială); Suport cu eliberare rapidă; Ajustare prin rotație (pivotare); Ajustarea înclinării/unghiului; Sistem de înclinare fără dinți; Altele
pt-PT: Funcionalidades de ajuste do suporte de tom: Ajuste de junta esférica a 360°; Inclinador dentado/serrilhado; Ajuste de altura (comprimento do braço); Compatível com bloqueio de memória; Ajuste omnidirecional de esfera (multieixos); Suporte de aperto rápido; Ajuste de rotação (giratório); Ajuste de inclinação/ângulo; Inclinador liso; Outro
tr: Tom montaj ayar özellikleri: 360° küresel mafsal ayarı; Dişli/tırtıklı eğici; Yükseklik ayarı (kol uzunluğu); Hafıza kilidi uyumlu; Çok yönlü top (çok eksenli) ayarı; Hızlı çıkarılabilir montaj; Dönüş (mil) ayarı; Eğim/açı ayarı; Dişsiz eğici; Diğer
vi: Các tính năng điều chỉnh giá đỡ Tom: Điều chỉnh khớp cầu 360°; Bộ nghiêng bánh răng/có khía; Điều chỉnh độ cao (chiều dài cần); Tương thích với khóa nhớ; Điều chỉnh Omni-ball (nhiều trục); Ngàm tháo lắp nhanh; Điều chỉnh xoay; Điều chỉnh góc/độ nghiêng; Bộ nghiêng không răng; Khác
en: Tom mount adjustment features: 360° ball joint adjustment; Geared/serrated tilter; Height adjustment (arm length); Memory lock compatible; Omni-ball (multi-axis) adjustment; Quick-release mount; Rotation (swivel) adjustment; Tilt/angle adjustment; Toothless tilter; Other
sk-SK: Funkcie nastavenia držiaka tom: 360° nastavenie guľového kĺbu; Ozubený kĺb; Nastavenie výšky (dĺžky ramena); Kompatibilné s pamäťovou objímkou; Nastavenie omni-ball (viacosové); Rýchloupínací držiak; Nastavenie rotácie (otočenia); Nastavenie sklonu/uhla; Hladký kĺb (bez zubov); Iné
nl: Tom mount verstelfuncties: 360° kogelgewrichtverstelling; Getande tilter; Hoogteverstelling (armlengte); Compatibel met memory lock; Omni-ball (meerassige) verstelling; Quick-release-bevestiging; Rotatieverstelling (swivel); Kantel-/hoekverstelling; Tandloze tilter; Overige
fr: Réglages du support de tom: Réglage rotule à 360°; Basculeur cranté/denté; Réglage de la hauteur (longueur de bras); Compatible avec bague mémoire; Réglage Omni-ball (multiaxe); Fixation à dégagement rapide; Réglage de la rotation (pivotant); Réglage de l’inclinaison/angle; Basculeur sans dents; Autre
sl-SI: Lastnosti nastavljanja nosilca za prehode: 360° nastavitev s krogličnim zglobom; Zobati mehanizem za nagib; Nastavitev višine (dolžina roke); Združljivo s spominsko objemko (memory lock); Večosna nastavitev Omni-ball; Nosilec s hitro sprostitvijo; Nastavitev vrtenja (vrtljivi zglob); Nastavitev nagiba/kota; Mehanizem za nagib brez zobnikov; Drugo
pt-BR: Recursos de ajuste do suporte Tom: Ajuste de junta esférica 360°; Inclinador de engrenagem/serrilhado; Ajuste de altura (comprimento do braço); Compatível com trava de memória; Ajuste omni-ball (multieixo); Montagem de liberação rápida; Ajuste de rotação (giratório); Ajuste de inclinação/ângulo; Inclinador sem dentes; Outros
it: Caratteristiche di regolazione del supporto del tom: Regolazione con giunto sferico a 360°; Inclinatore dentato; Regolazione dell'altezza (lunghezza del braccio); Compatibile con blocco di memoria; Regolazione omni-ball (multi-asse); Supporto a sgancio rapido; Regolazione della rotazione (girevole); Regolazione dell'inclinazione/dell'angolazione; Inclinatore senza denti; Altro
sv: Justeringsfunktioner för pukfäste: 360° kulledsjustering; Kugghjulsled; Höjdjustering (armlängd); Kompatibel med minneslås; Omniball (fleraxlig) justering; Snabbfäste; Rotationsjustering (svivel); Lutnings-/vinkeljustering; Steglös led; Övrigt
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ρύθμισης βάσης τομ: Ρύθμιση σφαιρικής άρθρωσης 360°; Γραναζωτός/οδοντωτός μηχανισμός κλίσης; Ρύθμιση ύψους (μήκος βραχίονα); Συμβατό με memory lock; Ρύθμιση omni-ball (πολλαπλών αξόνων); Βάση ταχείας αποδέσμευσης; Ρύθμιση περιστροφής (swivel); Ρύθμιση κλίσης/γωνίας; Μηχανισμός κλίσης χωρίς δόντια; Άλλο
bg-BG: Характеристики за регулиране на стойката за том: 360° настройка със сферична става; Назъбен механизъм за накланяне; Настройка на височината (дължина на рамото); Съвместимост с мемори ключ (memory lock); Многоосова настройка (omni-ball); Механизъм за бързо освобождаване; Настройка на ротацията (завъртане); Настройка на наклона/ъгъла; Механизъм за накланяне без зъбци; Друго
hr-HR: Značajke podešavanja nosača za tom: Podešavanje s kugličnim zglobom od 360°; Zupčasti/nazubljeni nagibnik; Podešavanje visine (duljina ruke); Kompatibilno s memorijskim bravama (memory lock); Omni-ball (višeosno) podešavanje; Nosač s brzim otpuštanjem; Podešavanje rotacije (zakretanja); Podešavanje nagiba/kuta; Nagibnik bez zubaca; Ostalo
da: Justeringsfunktioner for tom-holder: 360° kugleledsjustering; Tilt med tandhjul/tænder; Højdejustering (armlængde); Kompatibel med memory lock; Omni-ball-justering (flere akser); Montering med kvikudløser; Justering af rotation (svivel); Justering af hældning/vinkel; Tilt uden tænder; Andet
cs: Funkce nastavení držáku tomu: Nastavení kulového kloubu 360°; Ozubený naklápěcí mechanismus; Nastavení výšky (délka ramene); Kompatibilní s paměťovými zámky; Nastavení Omni-ball (víceosé); Rychloupínací držák; Nastavení natočení (otočné); Nastavení sklonu/úhlu; Bezzubý naklápěcí mechanismus; Jiné
zh-CN: 嗵鼓安装架调节功能: 360° 球头调节; 齿轮/锯齿倾斜调节; 高度调节（悬臂长度）; 兼容记忆锁; 万向球（多轴）调节; 快拆底座; 旋转（枢轴）调节; 倾斜/角度调节; 无齿倾斜调节; 其他
pl: Funkcje regulacji mocowania tom-tomu: Regulacja kulowa 360°; Mechanizm pochylenia zębaty/ząbkowany; Regulacja wysokości (długość ramienia); Kompatybilność z Memory Lock; Regulacja wieloosiowa Omni-ball; Mocowanie szybkozaciskowe; Regulacja obrotu (przegubowa); Regulacja nachylenia/kąta; Mechanizm pochylenia bez ząbków; Inne